Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.130

Commission officers—Members' fidelity bonds.

The commission may elect an executive secretary who is not a member and fix his or her compensation and may appoint a treasurer who shall sign all vouchers and receipts for moneys received by the commission. The commission shall purchase for each of its members a fidelity bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state, in favor of the state and the commission, in a sum to be determined by the commission.

[ 1989 c 5 s 12.]